Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Chapter 4

Administration of State Departments

4-4-101. Reorganization of divisions.

The commissioner of each department under chapter 3 of this title, with the approval of the governor, has the authority to consolidate any two (2) or more offices within the commissioner's department, or reduce the number of divisions, or create new divisions therein.

Notwithstanding subsection (a), no state department or agency in the executive branch of state government shall make organizational changes within such department or agency without the prior approval of the commissioner of finance and administration. If such organizational changes require a transfer of funds between organizational accounts and are contrary to the manner in which appropriations have been made in the appropriations act, then such transfer of funds is subject to approval by the commissioner of finance and administration and by a majority of a committee comprised of the speaker of the senate, the speaker of the house of representatives, and the comptroller of the treasury; provided, however, that if the transfer of funds is merely a change in the organizational account to which the appropriation is allocated and does not constitute a change in the purpose of the appropriation, then the approval of the committee shall not be required; provided further, however, that the approval of the commissioner of finance and administration shall be required.

Acts 1937, ch. 33, § 76; C. Supp. 1950, § 255.88 (Williams, § 255.81); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-401; Acts 2013, ch. 454, § 32.

Law Reviews.

The Independent Agency After Bowsher v. Synar — Alive and Kicking, 40 Vand. L. Rev. 903 (1987).

Attorney General Opinions. Governor's authority to transfer department functions and funds, OAG 98-041, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 41 (2/9/98).

4-4-102. Transfer of functions between departments.

The governor has the authority to transfer any functions between the departments created and established by chapter 3 of this title, except to or from the department of audit, in the interest of a more economical and efficient state service.

The governor shall make each such transfer by an executive order, a copy of which shall be filed with the secretary of state.

Acts 1937, ch. 33, § 77; C. Supp. 1950, § 255.89 (Williams, § 255.82); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-402.

Cross-References. Transfer of functions between departments with respect to federal-state programs, §4-4-117.

Attorney General Opinions. Governor's authority to transfer department functions and funds, OAG 98-041, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 41 (2/9/98).

T.C.A. §4-4-102 does not unconstitutionally delegate legislative powers to the governor in violation of the separation of powers clause, OAG 06-099 (6/8/06), 2006 Tenn. AG LEXIS 110.

4-4-103. Department regulations.

The commissioner of each department is empowered to prescribe regulations, not inconsistent with the law, for the government of the commissioner's department, the conduct of its employees, the distribution and performance of its business, and the custody, use and preservation of the records, papers, books, documents and property pertaining thereto.

Acts 1937, ch. 33, § 10; 1939, ch. 11, § 6; C. Supp. 1950, § 255.10; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-403.

Cross-References. Procedure for rules and regulations, title 4, ch. 5.

4-4-104. Department offices.

Each department shall maintain a central office at the capitol, which shall be the official residence of each commissioner, or head of department.

The commissioner of each department may, in the commissioner's discretion and with the approval of the governor, establish and maintain at places other than the seat of government, branch offices for any one (1) or more functions of the commissioner's department.

Acts 1937, ch. 33, § 11; C. Supp. 1950, § 255.11; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-404.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 24 Tenn. Juris., Venue, §§ 2, 4.

Law Reviews.

Judicial Review under the Tennessee Uniform Administrative Procedures Act — An Update (Ben H. Cantrell), 13 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 589 (1984).

4-4-105. Department office hours — Overtime.

Each department shall be opened for the transaction of public business from eight o'clock in the morning (8:00 a.m.) until four thirty in the afternoon (4:30 p.m.) of each day except Saturdays, Sundays and legal holidays.

Except for those personnel required to be on duty because of the pressure of business or in case of any emergency, state offices shall be closed and a holiday observed on the Monday following any legal holiday that falls on Sunday and on the Friday before any legal holiday that falls on Saturday.

The governor may, at the governor's discretion, substitute the Friday after the fourth Thursday in November, which is Thanksgiving Day, for the legal holiday that occurs on the second Monday in October, which is Columbus Day, for purposes of closing state offices only.

Each employee shall be granted a one (1) hour unpaid lunch period.

Whenever the pressure of business so demands and in cases of emergency, the commissioner in any department is authorized to direct that such personnel as may be required in any particular office shall be on duty, in which event the personnel performing such additional duties shall be entitled to equivalent time off at other times during the week.

Subsections (a) and (b) shall not apply to the uniformed members of the departments of safety or revenue; or to the game wardens or conservation officers charged with the enforcement of the fish and game laws; or to the employees of the department of transportation with the job title of highway response operator 1, highway response operator 2, highway response operator supervisor 1, highway response operator supervisor 2, communications dispatcher 1, communications dispatcher 2, transportation management center operator, transportation management center supervisor 1, transportation management center supervisor 2; or to any members or employees of the departments of correction or children's services, except administrative officials. Nor shall subsections (a) and (b) apply to employees and officials of hospitals or institutions, regardless of the department by which operated.

Any commissioned employee of the department of safety who is required to be on duty on any legal holiday shall be entitled to payment in addition to such employee's normal compensation. Payment shall be made in an amount recommended by the commissioner of safety, authorized in advance by the commissioner of human resources, and approved in advance by the commissioner of finance and administration. This subsection (d) shall not apply to any employee with a commission or rank of captain and above, except a captain over a division.

Acts 1937, ch. 33, § 12; 1939, ch. 11, § 7; 1945, ch. 30, § 1; 1949, ch. 83, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 255.12; Acts 1951, ch. 40, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1955, ch. 102, § 1; Acts 1967, ch. 337, § 1; 1974, ch. 638, § 1; 1975, ch. 37, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-405; Acts 1980, ch. 923, § 1; 1981, ch. 429, § 1; 1987, ch. 35, § 1; 1989, ch. 278, § 18; 1996, ch. 1079, § 16; 2004, ch. 602, § 1; 2007, ch. 30, § 1; 2007, ch. 60, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2007, ch. 60, § 3 provided that the references to the department of personnel are changed to the department of human resources, effective April 24, 2007.

Cross-References. Compensation for overtime, §8-23-201.

Legal holidays, §15-1-101.

4-4-106. Appointment of personnel.

Except as may be provided in this chapter, such officers, assistants and employees as may be necessary to carry on the work of each department of the state government shall be appointed by the commissioner or administrative head of such department from the list of eligibles furnished by the department of human resources, and subject to such minimum qualifications as to efficiency, as may be established by executive order of the governor, or by law.

Acts 1937, ch. 33, § 6; 1939, ch. 11, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, § 255.6; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-406; Acts 2007, ch. 60, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2007, ch. 60, § 3 provided that the references to the department of personnel are changed to the department of human resources, effective April 24, 2007.

4-4-107. Compensation of personnel — Discharge.

The governor may strike from the state payroll any state employee appointed by the governor or the governor's appointee, and may fix, increase or decrease the salary of such employee. The salaries of the commissioners and other officers as set out in §8-23-101 shall be fixed as therein provided. In no case, however, shall any compensation for personal services be fixed in excess of the amount of money appropriated by the general assembly for personal services in any department or agency of the state government.

Acts 1937, ch. 33, § 7; 1939, ch. 11, § 4; C. Supp. 1950, § 255.7; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-407.

4-4-108. Blanket surety bond.

A blanket surety bond shall be obtained covering all officers and employees of every department, agency, office, commission, institution, institution of higher education, and instrumentality of the executive, legislative and judicial branches of state government, except senators and representatives of the general assembly, delegates to a constitutional convention, judges of the supreme court, court of appeals, and court of criminal appeals, judges, clerks, officers and employees of the chancery, circuit, and criminal courts, and other courts of record other than the supreme court, court of appeals and court of criminal appeals, officers and employees of counties and municipalities, constables, notaries public, notaries at large, and any special deputy appointed by a sheriff pursuant to § 8-8-303.

The bond shall be executed by a surety company authorized to do business in this state and made payable to the state.

The bond may be written separately, or as a rider to, or as an extension of, coverage under a policy of insurance providing coverage to the state for other purposes.

The bond may provide separate or additional penalty amounts or conditions for an individual officer or employee or class of officers or employees when the interest of the state demands it.

The penalty amount or amounts for clerks, officers and employees of the supreme court, court of appeals, and court of criminal appeals shall be determined by the procurement commission after consulting with the judges of the supreme court or their designated representatives.

The penalty amount or amounts for the comptroller of the treasury, secretary of state and state treasurer, and their officers and employees, and the officers and employees of the general assembly shall be determined by the procurement commission after consulting with the speakers of the senate and the house of representatives or their designated representatives.

The penalty amount or amounts for all other officers and employees shall be determined by the procurement commission.

Any deductible amount or amounts shall be determined by the procurement commission and shall be commercially reasonable.

The form and conditions of the bond shall be determined pursuant to §§ 8-19-101 and 8-19-111.

It is the intent of the general assembly that the blanket surety bond required by subsection (a) shall be the only surety bond required for the officers and employees described in subsection (a).

Acts 1937, ch. 33, § 8; 1949, ch. 145, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 255.8; Acts 1970, ch. 601, §§ 1, 7; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-408; Acts 1980, ch. 887, § 1; 2011, ch. 295, § 19.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 6 Tenn. Juris., Clerks of Court, §§ 5, 14.

4-4-109. Services performed by one department for another.

Whenever, in the carrying on of the work of any department, the services of any expert, or the use of any special apparatus shall be desired, or any work needs to be done for which the department is not equipped, the commissioner thereof may request the assistance of any other department that may have the needed experts or apparatus. It is lawful for the department so called upon to cooperate in meeting the need so far as it can be done without detriment to the work of that department, and the actual costs, as determined by the commissioner of finance and administration, shall be the proper charge, unless otherwise approved by the commissioner of finance and administration, and filed with the comptroller of the treasury.

Acts 1919, ch. 167, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 325a114; Code 1932, § 340; Acts 1975, ch. 136, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-409.

Cross-References. Temporary transfers by personnel department, §4-3-1703.

4-4-110. Interdepartmental payments by agreement.

When costs provided in §4-4-109 have been incurred between departments, the commissioners thereof shall, from time to time, certify to the commissioner of finance and administration the sums due from the one to the other on account of such work, and the commissioner of finance and administration shall thereupon cause to be paid such sums to the creditor department. The payment may be made by check, as other state bills are paid, or by a system of debits and credits, as the commissioner of finance and administration may determine. All sums so received by, or credited to, any department shall be added to the current appropriation made for the support of that department, to the end that its appropriation may not be depleted by reason of the work done for another department.

Acts 1919, ch. 167, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 325a115; Code 1932, § 341; impl. am. Acts 1937, ch. 33, § 24; C. Supp. 1950, § 341; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 3; Acts 1975, ch. 136, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-410.

4-4-111. Interdepartmental payments — Approval.

When a department of state government or division of any department of state government renders services that are directly or indirectly incident to the duties of another department, then the department rendering such service may be reimbursed for the service by the other department out of the funds credited to the latter department, but such reimbursement shall only be made upon the approval of the commissioner of finance and administration.

Such reimbursement shall be made either by actual payment or by the proper bookkeeping entry in the department of finance and administration prior to the end of the fiscal year in which such services were rendered.

Acts 1939, ch. 100, §§ 1, 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 255.92 (Williams, § 255.86); impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 3; Acts 1975, ch. 136, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-411.

4-4-112. Cooperation between departments.

Two (2) or more departments shall unite in cooperative work in lines germane to the duties of those departments, and the commissioners thereof shall agree on the distribution of the expense to be incurred.

The agreement shall include the payment or transfer from one department to another of a lump sum, and the payment by the department receiving the same, of all expenses incurred in such cooperative work.

The commissioner of finance and administration shall, upon due notification of the agreement, make the necessary payments, or credits and debits, from sums not otherwise under requisition by the cooperating departments.

Acts 1919, ch. 167, § 3; Shan. Supp., § 325a116; Code 1932, § 342; impl. am. Acts 1937, ch. 33, § 24; C. Supp. 1950, § 342; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 3; Acts 1975, ch. 136, § 4; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-412.

4-4-113. Federal funds — Acceptance and use — Notification.

Any department of state government may accept and use federal financial assistance from any agency or instrumentality of the federal government for purposes of carrying on programs in which such department may be authorized to engage; provided, that such acceptance shall be with the express approval of the governor; and such department, acting through its commissioner, is authorized to enter into any and all requisite agreements with such federal agency or instrumentality for the purpose of acceptance and use of such financial assistance; provided, further, that no agreement or contract shall be made by such department involving the expenditure of funds beyond those available to such department by appropriation, gift, or otherwise.

Any department of state government receiving federal financial assistance shall notify the comptroller of the treasury and the commissioner of finance and administration within five (5) business days from the date of receipt by the department's commissioner or chief financial officer, or equivalent, of official notice in any form or type from the federal awarding agency, or designated cognizant agency, notifying the department of a determination of noncompliance with, or any deficiencies related to compliance with, federal statutes, regulations, or the terms and conditions of a federal award that could result in the following:

Repayment of federal financial assistance;

Reduction in future federal financial assistance by administrative offset against other requests for reimbursements or subsequent awards;

Withholding of advance payments otherwise due to the department;

Temporary withholding of federal financial assistance pending corrective action by the department;

Whole or partial suspension or termination of the federal award; or

Federal awarding agency taking any other remedies legally available to it, including not seeking recovery of a disallowance or improper payment.

All official notices resulting in items described in subdivisions (b)(1)-(6) received by staff of any department of state government pursuant to subsection (b) shall be transmitted to the department's commissioner or chief financial officer, or equivalent, within five (5) business days of receipt.

Acts 1945, ch. 120, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 423.3 (Williams, § 423.28); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-413; Acts 2017, ch. 79, § 1.

4-4-114. Reports.

The head of each administrative department, established by chapter 3 of this title, and the state treasurer, the secretary of state and the adjutant general, unless otherwise provided in this title, shall annually, on or before October 1, report in writing to the governor concerning the functions, management and financial transactions of such person's department or agency for the preceding fiscal year.

Such reports, or parts thereof, or summaries and digests thereof, shall be published under the supervision of the tourism division, department of tourist development, upon the direction of the governor.

The commissioner of finance and administration shall promulgate rules and regulations governing the size, format, contents and publishing of all reports of all executive departments and agencies of the state required to make semiannual or annual reports.

The rules and regulations shall include a provision stipulating that there shall be no automatic distribution of reports or publications, except the distribution provided for by title 12, chapter 6, or otherwise by law or resolution enacted after May 25, 1984.

All executive departments and agencies of the state required to make semiannual or annual reports shall make such reports in conformity with the rules and regulations promulgated for such reports by the commissioner of finance and administration.

Acts 1937, ch. 33, § 9; 1939, ch. 11, § 5; 1941, ch. 10, § 1; 1943, ch. 8, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 255.9; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 11; Acts 1965, ch. 308, § 1; 1971, ch. 66, §§ 1, 2; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 852, § 14; impl. am. Acts 1976, ch. 468, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-414; Acts 1984, ch. 798, § 1.

Cross-References. State treasurer, statement to governor before meeting of general assembly, §8-5-111.

4-4-115. Substitute for disabled department head.

In the event of the absence, illness or disability of any commissioner or the head of any department, division or agency of the executive department of state government, the governor is authorized and empowered to designate and appoint a qualified person to act in such capacity.

The person so designated shall have all the powers, duties and responsibility provided for such office under the statutes of this state during the time such person is so serving.

This section shall apply to the secretary of state, the comptroller of the treasury and the state treasurer, except as provided for in §§ 8-3-105, 8-4-302 and 8-5-202.

Acts 1961, ch. 115, § 1; modified; T.C.A., § 4-415.

4-4-116. Federal aid — Federal grant programs.

The governor, acting on behalf of the state, is hereby authorized and empowered to accept from the federal government through any of its departments, bureaus, agencies or other instrumentalities, federal aid made available to this state, whether by grant or loan through any executive order of the president or any act of congress heretofore or hereafter enacted; provided, that any such aid accepted in the form of a loan is subject to the approval of the funding board.

For the purpose of establishing and administering federal grant programs by this state, the governor or the governor's designee is authorized to cooperate with or enter into agreement with, or both, any official of another state.

The governor or the governor's designee is authorized to enter into contracts, in accordance with all applicable laws, rules and regulations, and procedures regarding such contracts, and perform all things necessary in the governor's discretion to secure to this state and citizens of this state the benefits of federal grant programs.

Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 9; 1965, ch. 167, § 1; T.C.A., § 4-416; Acts 1988, ch. 524, § 1.

4-4-117. Federal-state programs — Transfer of functions between departments.

Notwithstanding the rights, powers and duties that have heretofore been vested in or exercised by any officer, board, commission, department, or other agency of state government to the contrary, the governor has the authority and is hereby empowered to transfer any functions exercised with respect to any joint federal-state programs between the departments, agencies, commissions or boards, whenever such transfers will facilitate the operation of governmental programs or where such transfers are desirable to meet the changes in federal statutes.

The governor has the authority and is hereby authorized to assign or reassign responsibility for any joint federal-state programs hereafter established to any state department, agency, commission or board created under the statutes of the state not inconsistent with the executive order or congressional enactment for the administration of such programs.

Acts 1961, ch. 241, § 2; T.C.A., § 4-417.

Cross-References. Transfer of functions between departments, §4-4-102.

Attorney General Opinions. “Joint federal-state programs” defined, OAG 95-046, 1995 Tenn. AG LEXIS 47 (5/3/95).

Governor's authority to transfer department functions and funds, OAG 98-041, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 41 (2/9/98).

4-4-118. Readers for blind employees.

The commissioner of each department of the executive branch of state government is authorized, in the commissioner's discretion, to employ a reading assistant or assistants for any blind employee in the commissioner's department, to serve without compensation from such department.

Each such reading assistant may be paid for services as reading assistant by and from such blind employee or any nonprofit organization.

“Blind employee” as used in this section means an employee of the state who establishes to the satisfaction of the commissioner of the department where such employee works, that such employee has an impairment of sight, either permanent or temporary, that is so severe or disabling that the employment of a reading assistant or assistants for such employee is necessary or desirable to enable such employee properly to perform such employee's work.

This section shall not be held or considered to prevent or limit in any way the assignment to a blind employee by a department of clerical or secretarial assistance at the expense of such department, if such assistance is normally provided or authorized.

Acts 1963, ch. 142, § 1; T.C.A., § 4-418.

Cross-References. Appointment of personnel, §4-4-106.

“Legal blindness” and “total blindness” defined, §1-3-112.

4-4-119. [Reserved.]

The commissioner of finance and administration and the comptroller of the treasury shall establish procedures for the writing-off of uncollectable accounts receivable by all state agencies, departments and institutions that charge the public, create a debt to the state, and maintain accounts receivable.

No state agency, department or institution described in this section shall write off uncollectable accounts receivable except by the procedure to be established as provided in this section.

Every rule or regulation, or change thereto, promulgated under the authority of this section shall:

Be filed with the secretary of state;

Bear the name of the person or persons proposing such rule or regulation; and

Have attached thereto a copy of the roll call vote on adoption by “aye” or “no” of each person voting.

Acts 1977, ch. 93, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., § 4-420.

4-4-121. Smoking policies.

Smoking shall be prohibited in all buildings that are owned or operated by the state, except for those sleeping rooms in state park inns, cabins that are designated as smoking rooms or cabins, and as provided by § 49-7-135. It is the intent of the general assembly that all buildings that are owned or operated by the state, other than sleeping rooms in state park inns, cabins designated for smoking, and as provided by § 49-7-135, shall be completely smoke-free.

Smoking shall be prohibited in all motor vehicles that are owned, leased, or operated by the state. It is the intent of the general assembly that all motor vehicles that are owned, leased, or operated by the state shall be completely smoke-free.

Acts 1990, ch. 700, § 1; 2005, ch. 329, § 2; 2006, ch. 876, § 1; 2007, ch. 463, § 1; 2017, ch. 161, § 1.

Cross-References. Policies on smoking in student dormitories, §49-7-135.

Law Reviews.

“Get Off Your Butts”: The Employer's Right to Regulate Employee Smoking (David B. Ezra), 60 Tenn. L. Rev. 905 (1993).

Attorney General Opinions. Americans with Disabilities Act — smoking — employees — state buildings, OAG 93-40, 1993 Tenn. AG LEXIS 38 (4/28/93).

T.C.A. §4-4-121 does not prohibit smoking nor does it require a state agency to adopt a smoking policy, OAG 02-111, 2002 Tenn. AG LEXIS 118 (10/07/02).

T.C.A. §4-4-121 authorizes administrative heads of state agencies to create smoking policies for buildings the administrative heads supervise or control; if an agency adopts a smoking policy, the agency must provide smokers with at least one designated indoor smoking area, OAG 02-111, 2002 Tenn. AG LEXIS 118 (10/07/02).

Where T.C.A. §4-4-121 and the Children's Act for Clean Indoor Air, T.C.A. §39-17-1601 et seq., conflict, the latter act governs, OAG 02-111, 2002 Tenn. AG LEXIS 118 (10/07/02).

The federal Pro-Children Act of 1994, compiled in 20 U.S.C. § 6081 et seq., which prohibits persons from smoking in any indoor facility where children receive routine or regular health, day care, education or library services, if these services are funded by the federal government, or through state or local governments, by federal grant, loan, loan guarantee, or contract, prevails over state law to the extent that state law conflicts with the federal act, OAG 02-111, 2002 Tenn. AG LEXIS 118 (10/07/02).

The State Capitol Commission may establish a policy that prohibits smoking in the Capitol or permits smoking in certain areas thereof subject to (i) the concurrence of the State Building Commission and (ii) compliance with the requirements of this section, OAG 03-099, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 115 (8/13/03).

4-4-122. Employees who are victims of criminal offenses — Restraints on exercise of rights prohibited — Grievance procedure.

No branch, department, agency or other subdivision of state government shall terminate, dismiss, demote or take any other disciplinary action against an employee of such entity who is the victim of a criminal offense solely because such employee takes any lawful action to cause or assist in causing the arrest, prosecution and conviction of the perpetrator of such offense.

No branch, department, agency or other subdivision of state government shall by rule, regulation or policy prohibit an employee thereof who is the victim of a criminal offense from taking any lawful action to cause or assist in causing the arrest, prosecution and conviction of the perpetrator of such offense.

Any state employee adversely affected by a violation of this section shall be entitled to file a grievance in accordance with the grievance procedure set out in § 8-30-318. The procedure and remedies set out in § 8-30-318 shall govern violations of this section.

Acts 1991, ch. 239, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 800 rewrote the civil service provisions. Because of the amendments to the civil service provisions, the reference to grievance procedures and §8-30-328 are no longer valid. For present comparable provisions on appeal provisions, see §8-30-318.

4-4-123. Title IX implementation plan.

Each entity of state government that is subject to the requirements of Title IX of the Education Amendments Act of 1972 (20 U.S.C. § 1681 et seq.), and regulations promulgated pursuant to Title IX, shall develop a Title IX implementation plan with participation by protected beneficiaries as may be required by such law or regulations. To the extent applicable, such plan shall include Title IX implementation plans of any subrecipients of federal funds through the state entity. Each such entity of state government shall submit annual Title IX compliance reports and implementation plan updates to the department of audit by October 1, 2008, and each October 1 thereafter. The reporting period shall cover the most recent full fiscal year. At least once each year, the department of audit shall publish a cumulative report of its findings and recommendations concerning compliance with the requirements of this section. The cumulative annual report shall be distributed to the governor, to each member of the general assembly, and to each library designated as a depository of state reports and documents.

It is the legislative intent that any increased costs incurred by state entities as a result of this section shall, to the extent legally available, be paid from federal funds available therefor.

Acts 1998, ch. 758, §§ 1, 2; 2008, ch. 629, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Former §4-4-123(c), concerning a study to determine special actions to be taken to implement Title IX, was deemed obsolete by the code commission in 2005.

Cross-References. Reporting requirement satisfied by notice to general assembly members of publication of report, §3-1-114.

4-4-124. Executive internal auditor.

The governor shall appoint an executive internal auditor, who shall serve at the pleasure of the governor.

The executive internal auditor shall:

Develop comprehensive internal audit standards for executive branch agencies, which shall:

Incorporate the Standards for Internal Control in the Federal Government issued by the United States government accountability office, referred to as the “Green Book,” as amended, revised, or modified;

Incorporate the International Standards for the Professional Practice of Internal Auditing issued by the Institute of Internal Auditors, as amended, revised, or modified; and

Include any other standards deemed appropriate by the executive internal auditor;

Provide best practices training for internal audit staff on internal audit standards, internal controls, and enterprise risk management;

Provide peer review for internal audit staff within executive branch agencies consistent with standards set by the Institute of Internal Auditors;

Review and approve internal audit plans for executive branch agencies; and

Coordinate internal auditors on statewide issues.

The executive internal auditor may exercise jurisdiction and control over the internal audit staff and the internal audit function of any executive branch agency.

After October 1, 2016, the management and operations for the internal audit function of each executive branch agency shall be established in accordance with this section.

If the executive internal auditor assumes jurisdiction and control over the internal audit function of an executive branch agency, then the agency's internal audit staff shall report to and serve at the pleasure of the executive internal auditor.

If the executive internal auditor does not assume jurisdiction and control over the internal audit function of an executive branch agency, the agency's internal audit staff shall report to and serve at the pleasure of the commissioner. The executive internal auditor shall participate in the evaluations of any internal audit director under the jurisdiction and control of a commissioner.

If an individual serves simultaneously as the commissioner of an agency and the executive internal auditor, then the internal audit staff within the commissioner's agency shall report to and serve at the pleasure of the commissioner. The governor or the governor's designee shall participate in the evaluations of any internal audit director under the jurisdiction and control of a commissioner serving simultaneously as the executive internal auditor.

A commissioner shall not terminate any person serving as an internal audit director in an executive branch agency without the approval of the executive internal auditor. A commissioner serving simultaneously as the executive internal auditor shall not terminate any person serving as an internal audit director within the commissioner's agency without the approval of the governor or the governor's designee.

The governor shall utilize existing executive branch resources and personnel in the implementation of this section. The governor is authorized to effectuate the purposes of this section in accordance with § 4-4-102.

The commissioner of finance and administration is authorized, within existing resources, to develop cost allocation procedures and interagency billing for services associated with the implementation of this section.

Nothing in this section shall expand or diminish the authority of the comptroller of the treasury or the offices of the comptroller of the treasury.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Commissioner” means the chief executive officer of an agency;

“Executive branch agency” or “agency”:

Means any unit organization of the executive branch of state government; and

Does not include the political subdivisions of the state, institutions under the control of the University of Tennessee or the Tennessee board of regents, the judicial branch, or the legislative branch;

“Governor's designee” means any individual designated by the governor other than the executive internal auditor or an employee of the executive internal auditor;

“Internal audit director” means an individual who is:

Primarily responsible for the internal audit function of an executive branch agency; and

Responsible for the supervision, management, or control of internal audit staff, if any; and

“Internal audit staff” includes any individual in an executive branch agency position who is involved in the internal audit function of an executive branch agency.

Acts 2016, ch. 824, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former §4-4-124 (Acts 1998, ch. 1111, § 1), concerning the posting of applications for funds or grants on the state Internet site, was repealed by Acts 2003, ch. 355, § 1, effective June 16, 2003.

4-4-125. [Repealed.]

Acts 2001, ch. 427, § 1; 2002, ch. 810, § 1; 2002, ch. 849, § 13; 2015, ch. 225, §§ 1-3; repealed by Acts 2016, ch. 722, § 9, effective July 1, 2016.

Compiler's Notes. Former section 4-4-125 concerned dissemination of social security numbers.